District of Columbia statutes.
7-2504.09

Certain information obtained from or retained by dealers not to be used as evidence in criminal proceedings.

No information obtained from or retained by a licensed dealer to comply with this unit shall be used as evidence against such licensed dealer in any criminal proceeding with respect to a violation of this unit occurring prior to or concurrently with the filing of such information; provided, that this section shall not apply to any violation of § 22-2402, or of § 7-2507.04.

History

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title IV, § 409, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-62, § 2, 24 DCR 5780
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-24, § 13, 30 DCR 3341

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2349.
1973 Ed., § 6-1849.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(l) of Firearms Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-352, May 11, 2012, 59 DCR 5116).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(l) of the Firearms Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-394, July 18, 2012, 59 DCR 8694).